South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 48-52-620(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A)(1)  Each state agency and public school district shall submit for approval to the State Energy Office an energy conservation plan for buildings in use on July 1, 2008, with a goal to reduce energy consumption by at least one percent annually for five consecutive years beginning July 1, 2008. The plan also must have a goal of ultimately reducing energy consumption for buildings in use on July 1, 2008, by twenty percent by July 1, 2020, relative to year 2000 levels. An agency shall implement all available cost-effective energy-saving measures to pursue these goals. In determining whether an energy-saving method is cost effective, an agency should primarily consider the measure's cost effectiveness over a five-year period rather than within one fiscal year. The State Energy Office shall provide agency assistance and information needed to help meet these goals. (2) The provisions of this section do not apply to a building designed, constructed or rehabilitated, and maintained in compliance with the Energy Independence and Sustainable Construction Act of 2007. SECTION 2.  Article 6, Chapter 52, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 48-52-690. (A) Any new state-owned building must comply with the latest edition of the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air Conditioning Engineers, also known as "ASHRAE", as referenced in the International Codes adopted by the South Carolina Building Codes Council. (B) Any new state-owned building over 15,000 square feet must be commissioned by a third-party commissioning agent prior to final acceptance. For purposes of this subsection, "third-party commissioning agent" means a person accredited by the U.S. Green Building Council or the Green Building Initiative, with expertise in building system performance, who will analyze, evaluate, and confirm the proper function and performance of a high-performance building, its systems, equipment, and indoor air quality, and who did not participate in the original certification of the state building. SECTION 3.  Article (8), Chapter 52, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----